Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-478
Rural emergency hospital; federal reimbursement; contracts.

A licensed rural emergency hospital may enter into any contracts required to be eligible for federal reimbursement as a rural emergency hospital.

Laws 2022, LB697, § 6.